Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Boat and Water Safety Commission

§ 59-21-111.
Assumption of duties and responsibilities of Boat and Water Safety Commission.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be the Mississippi Boat and Water Safety Commission, and shall exercise the duties and responsibilities of the Mississippi Boat and Water Safety Commission through the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, insofar as practicable under the provisions of Chapter 4 of Title 49, Mississippi Code of 1972; except on marine waters under the jurisdiction of the Commission on Marine Resources.

The Commission on Marine Resources shall exercise the duties and responsibilities of the Mississippi Boat and Water Safety Commission through the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources on the marine waters of the state. The Commission on Marine Resources shall not exercise any powers related to numbering of undocumented vessels. Those powers are vested exclusively in the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-22; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 8; Laws, 1968, ch. 266, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 29; Laws, 1994, ch. 353, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 640, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§§ 59-21-113 and 59-21-115. .
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

59-21-113. [Codes, 1942, § 8496-22; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 22; 1964, ch. 468,§ 8; 1968, ch. 266, § 1]

59-21-115. [Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; 1964, ch. 468, § 9; 1968, ch. 265, § 4]

§ 59-21-117.
Promulgation of rules and regulations generally.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and to advertise and promote the fresh waterways of the state.

The Commission on Marine Resources shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of Sections 59-21-111 through 59-21-129. The Commission on Marine Resources shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with subsections (4) and (5).

The provisions of Sections 59-21-117 through 59-21-127 shall be applicable to all waters of this state that are under the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi.

Before any rules and regulations are adopted, the proposed rules and regulations shall be reduced to writing and a public hearing shall be held after at least thirty (30) days’ notice of the hearing. The notice shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in this state. A copy of the proposed rules and regulations shall be furnished to the sheriff of each county affected at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing. The hearing shall be held at a place convenient to the largest number of owners of vessels affected by the proposed rules and regulations or, if of general statewide application, shall be held in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

A copy of the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, and amendments thereto, shall be filed in the office of the commission adopting the regulations and in the office of the sheriff of each county affected where the same shall be maintained as a public record. The rules and regulations shall be published in a convenient form and shall be given to each recipient of an original, renewed, transferred, or a recorded certificate of number.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4; Laws, 1973, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 439, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 59-21-119.
Purchase, operation and maintenance of equipment; purchase of property damage insurance.

The commission is hereby authorized to purchase, operate and maintain such motor vehicles, boats, trailers, motors and other equipment as may be deemed necessary and proper for the administration of this chapter. The commission may purchase property damage insurance on its motor vehicles, boats, trailers, motors and other equipment, and may expend funds from any available source for the purpose of obtaining such insurance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2007.).

§ 59-21-121.
Regulation of regattas, boat races, exhibitions, etc.

Any person or organization sponsoring a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament or exhibition shall be responsible for providing adequate protection from marine traffic interference and hazards. The commission may adopt and may from time to time amend regulations governing the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 59-21-123.
Enforcement officers; employment and compensation.

The executive director with the approval of the commission may employ and fix the duties of such clerical assistants, enforcement officers and other agents as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to fix their tenure of employment and compensation therefor; provided, however, that enforcement officers shall meet the same requirements and qualifications as required for conservation officers in Section 49-1-15(1) and (2).

The salaries of such paid employees shall be paid out of any funds which may be received by the commission for the administration of this chapter. All salaries and positions are to conform with the requirements of the state classification commission law of 1970. In addition to their salaries, the enforcement officers may be paid in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, for their necessary travel when performed by private conveyance and will be reimbursed for their actual expenses not to exceed eighteen dollars ($18.00) per day while actually engaged in the performance of their duties, to be allowed only on expense account itemized and filed by them with, and approved by, the executive director and the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4; Laws, 1973, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 553, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 59-21-125.
Enforcement officers; bond.

Each enforcement officer shall execute and file with the state treasurer a good and sufficient surety bond in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), conditioned on the faithful performance of his respective duties. Each enforcement officer shall be reimbursed by the commission for the premiums on his bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 59-21-127.
Enforcement officers; powers and duties.

It shall be the duty of all enforcement officers to enforce, and to obey and carry out all instructions, directions, rules and regulations of the commission with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. Each enforcement officer shall account for and pay over, pursuant to law, all monies received by him under this chapter.

Such enforcement officers shall have the power, and it shall be their duty, to execute all warrants for violations of the rules and regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter; to serve subpoenas issued for the examination and investigation or trial of such violations; to board and examine, without warrant, any vessel required to be numbered under this chapter, to ascertain whether any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission has been or is being violated, and to use such force as may be necessary for the purpose of such examination and inspection; to arrest, without warrant, any person committing a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission in the presence of the enforcement officers, and to take such person before a magistrate or court having jurisdiction for trial or hearing; and to exercise such other powers of peace officers in the enforcement of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission or of a judgment for the violation thereof, as are not herein specifically provided. No enforcement officers shall compromise or settle out of court any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-23; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 9; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 59-21-129.
Adoption of special rules and regulations.

Any agency or political subdivision of this state may make application to the commission for special rules and regulations with reference to the operation, equipment or safety of vessels on any waters of this state within its territorial limits or authorized jurisdiction and shall set forth therein the reasons which make special rules or regulations necessary or appropriate. The commission is hereby authorized, after notice and a public hearing as provided in Section 59-21-117, to make special rules and regulations with reference to the operation, equipment or safety of vessels or motorboats on any waters of the state.

The several counties and municipalities bordering the Mississippi Sound or the other coastal or tidal waters of this state are authorized and empowered to adopt ordinances setting out special rules and regulations with reference to the operation, equipment, or safety of vessels or motorboats on the Mississippi Sound or the other coastal or tidal waters of the state within their territorial limits, and shall set forth therein the reasons which make special rules and regulations necessary or appropriate. No ordinance shall conflict with the provisions of this chapter or with the regulations of any federal agency having jurisdiction over those waters. Notice shall be given of the proposed ordinance and a hearing shall be held thereon before the Commission on Marine Resources as provided in Section 59-21-117, and as a condition precedent, the Commission on Marine Resources shall recommend the adoption of the ordinance.

It is the intent of this chapter that uniform regulations of general application to all the waters of this state shall be adopted and promulgated wherever practicable, and any special regulation or local ordinance, as authorized herein, shall be limited to the exigencies of local conditions which cannot be corrected by a regulation generally applicable to all the waters of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-24; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 24; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 10; Laws, 1973, ch. 458, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 439, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1995.